Louisiana, session 2026, HB959.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The sum of Fifty Thousand and No/100 ($50,000.00) Dollars is hereby
payable out of the State General Fund (Direct) for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for payment of the
consent judgment captioned "Gaetano J. Montana. versus Eagle, Inc., et al", signed on
October 1, 2025, between the state of Louisiana through the Board of Supervisors of the
Louisiana State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College through Louisiana State
University Health Sciences Center, University Hospital, and Gaetano J. Montana, Jr., Angele
Montana, and Yvette Montana, individually and on behalf of decedent, Gaetano J. Montana,
bearing Number 2023-06713, Division "D", on the docket of the Civil District Court, parish
of Orleans, state of Louisiana.
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-591 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 959
Section 2. A judgment may only be paid from this appropriation if it is final and shall
be paid as to principal, court costs, and expert witness fees as awarded in the judgment.
Interest shall be paid as provided by law and awarded in the judgment. If the provisions of
the judgment conflict with the provisions of this Act, the provisions of the judgment shall
be controlling. Any other provision of this Act not in conflict with the provisions of the
judgment shall control. Payment shall be made only after presentation to the state treasurer
of documentation required by the state treasurer. Further, the judgment shall be deemed to
have been paid on the effective date of this Act, and interest shall cease to run as of that date.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.